Maryland, session 2025, HB0238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–113.
(a) The investigating unit of a law enforcement agency shall immediately review
a complaint by a member of the public alleging police officer misconduct.
(b) An administrative charging committee shall review and make a determination
or ask for further review within 30 days after completion of the investigating unit’s review.
(c) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, FOR
AN INCIDENT INVOLVING A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC AND A POLICE OFFICER, THE
process of review by the investigating unit through disposition by the administrative
charging committee shall be completed within 1 year and 1 day after the [filing of a
complaint by a citizen] DATE THAT THE APPROPRIATE OFFICIAL EMPLOYED BY THE
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY BECAME AWARE OF THE INCIDENT.
(D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL FILE ANY ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGES ARISING OUT
OF AN INVESTIGATION OF ALLEGED POLICE OFFICER MISCONDUCT THAT IS NOT
REQUIRED TO BE REVIEWED BY AN ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE
WITHIN 1 YEAR AND 1 DAY AFTER THE DATE THAT THE APPROPRIATE OFFICIAL
EMPLOYED BY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY BECAME AWARE OF THE INCIDENT
THAT LED TO THE INVESTIGATION.
(E) IF ALLEGED POLICE OFFICER MISCONDUCT IS RELATED TO ACTIVITY
THAT REASONABLY APPEARS TO BE THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION,
AN ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY
SHALL FILE ANY ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGES WITHIN 1 YEAR AND 1 DAY AFTER THE
DATE OF:
(1) THE INVESTIGATING LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY’S
DETERMINATION THAT THE MATTER IS NOT RELATED TO CRIMINAL ACTIVITY;
(2) THE FINAL DISPOSITION OF ALL RELATED CRIMINAL CHARGES;
OR
(3) THE ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE’S OR LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY’S RECEIPT OF NOTICE THAT THE APPROPRIATE
PROSECUTORIAL AUTHORITY DECLINED TO FILE CRIMINAL CHARGES.

HOUSE BILL 238 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.